New York, session 2025-2026, A5238.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 2 and 3 of section 6525 of the education law, 2 as added by chapter 987 of the laws of 1971, are amended to read as 3 follows: 4 2. Limit of practice. A permittee shall be authorized to practice 5 medicine only under the supervision of a licensed physician and only in: 6 (a) a public, voluntary, or proprietary hospital; 7 (b) a patient care facility operated by or for any federally recog- 8 nized American Indian tribe, a prison, a school, or a university; 9 (c) a community health center or federally qualified health center; or 10 (d) a private office or clinic with at least four practicing supervis- 11 ing licensed physicians, operating on a two to one supervision ratio of 12 two permittees per physician. 13 3. Duration. A limited permit shall be valid for two years and may be 14 renewed biennially. [It may be renewed biennially at the discretion of 15 the department] Permits may be renewed at the discretion of the depart- 16 ment, provided, however, that the department shall not deny a limited 17 permit based solely on the previous number of authorizations that the 18 department has issued to the applicant. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07986-01-5